Utah statutes.
78B-5-203.   Judgment against party dying after verdict or decision.

If a party dies after a verdict or decision upon any issue of fact, and before judgment, the judgment is not a lien on the real property of the deceased party, but is payable in the course of the administration of the party's estate.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

